Hawaii statutes.
§577-18 Parents allowing children in
street, prohibited when; penalty. Any parent or guardian having the care,
custody, and control of a child under sixteen years of age, who, except in case
of necessity, knowingly, and voluntarily suffers or permits such child to go or
remain on any public street, highway or public place after ten o'clock in the
evening and before four o'clock in the morning, unaccompanied by an adult
person thereto authorized by such parent or guardian, shall be fined not more
than $100 or imprisoned not more than twenty days. [L 1896, c 29, §2; RL 1925,
§3050; RL 1935, §4532; am L 1943, c 78, pt of §1; RL 1945, §12284; RL 1955,
§330-16; HRS §577-18; am L 1975, c 77, §1(7)]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, 663.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next